Illinois, session 104th, HB1460.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-35 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-35)7    Sec. 5-35. Personal needs allowance. 8    (a) For a person who is a resident in a facility licensed 9under the ID/DD Community Care Act, the Community-Integrated 10Living Arrangements Licensure and Certification Act, the 11Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the 12MC/DD Act for whom payments are made under this Article 13throughout a month and who is determined to be eligible for 14medical assistance under this Article, the State shall pay an 15amount in addition to the minimum monthly personal needs 16allowance authorized under Section 1902(q) of Title XIX of the 17Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(q)) so that the person's 18total monthly personal needs allowance from both State and 19federal sources equals $60.20    (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, for a person who is a 21resident in a facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care 22Act, the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements Licensure 23and Certification Act, or the MC/DD Act for whom payments are   HB1460- 2 -LRB104 03262 KTG 13284 b1made under this Article throughout a month and who is 2determined to be eligible for medical assistance under this 3Article, the State shall pay an amount in addition to the 4minimum monthly personal needs allowance authorized under 5Section 1902(q) of Title XIX of the Social Security Act so that 6the person's total monthly personal needs allowance from both 7State and federal sources equals $90. 8    (c) Beginning January 1, 2027, the personal needs 9allowance described in subsection (b) shall increase annually 10at the same rate as the Social Security cost-of-living 11adjustment to take effect on January 1 of each year. 12(Source: P.A. 100-23, eff. 7-6-17.)